Tennessee, session 114, SB0427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(a)(3)(A), is amended by
adding the language "and according to subdivision (a)(3)(G)" immediately after the language
"according to the latest federal census and other censuses authorized by law".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(a)(3), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision (G):
Notwithstanding the right or ability of a county or municipality to take a special
census at any time during the interim between the regular decennial federal census
under this section or another law, the department of economic and community
development shall revise and certify the population of each county and municipality, and
the aggregate population of the state, prior to July 1 each year during the interim
between the regular decennial federal census according to this subdivision (a)(3)(G) for
purposes of ensuring equitable allocation and distribution of moneys under this
subdivision (a)(3). The Boyd Center for Business and Economic Research at the
University of Tennessee, through the Tennessee state data center, shall generate
annual population estimates for each county and municipality and provide the estimates
to the department of economic and community development for review and certification.
Prior to July 1, the department of economic and community development shall provide
the revised, certified populations of each county and municipality to the department of
SB0427
001090
- 1 -

revenue and the department of finance and administration. The allocation and
distribution of moneys pursuant to this subdivision (a)(3) must be made according to the
revised populations certified under this subdivision (a)(3)(G) except in instances where a
jurisdiction's population is revised as a result of a special census or in a year in which
populations are revised as a result of the regular decennial federal census.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(j)(4), is amended by adding
the language "or according to subdivision (a)(3)(G)" immediately after the language "according
to the latest federal census or other censuses authorized by law".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001090